Connecticut, session 2026, HB05440.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 47a-45a of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) If it is found (1) that a forcible entry has been made into the land,
tenement or dwelling unit, or (2) that the same are detained with force
and strong hand, or (3) that damage has been caused to the premises or
damage to or removal of or detention of the personal property of the
possessor, or (4) that the party put out of possession would be required
to cause damage to the premises or commit a breach of the peace in
order to regain possession, as complained of, the judge shall render
judgment that the complainant be restored to, and reseized of, the
premises or that the personal property removed or detained be returned
to the complainant, and shall award a writ of restitution accordingly.
The complainant shall recover costs and reasonable attorney's fees from
the person complained of. Execution shall be granted against the person
LCO No. 2481 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 5440
complained of.
Sec. 2. Section 47a-46 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
The party aggrieved may recover in a civil action double damages,
[and his] costs and reasonable attorney's fees against the defendant, if it
is found on the trial of a complaint brought under section 47a-43 that
[he] the defendant entered into the land, tenement or dwelling unit by
force or after entry held the same by force or otherwise injured the party
aggrieved in the manner described in section 47a-43.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 47a-45a(a)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 47a-46